Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.150

Recording requirements.

The secretary of state shall not certify under this title any voting device or machine for use in conducting a primary or general or special election in this state unless the device or machine correctly records on a separate ballot the votes cast by each elector for any person and for or against any measure and such separate ballots are available for audit purposes after such a primary or election.

[ 2013 c 11 s 24; 2003 c 111 s 315; 1998 c 245 s 26; 1991 c 363 s 30; 1990 c 184 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.200.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.